Tennessee statutes. Title 58 Military Affairs, Emergencies and Civil Defense
Part 6

Armed Forces — Penal Provisions

58-1-601. Rights-of-way — Highways — Exceptions.

Troops of the United States or of the Tennessee national guard parading or performing any duty according to law shall have the right-of-way on any street or highway over which they may pass, except that the carriage of the United States mail, legitimate functions of police departments, and the operations of fire departments shall not be interfered with thereby.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, §§ 87, 88; T.C.A., § 7-301; Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 17.

Cross-References. Ferries and toll bridges free to specified persons and their baggage, § 54-13-104.

58-1-602. Unlawful wearing of uniform or insignia. [Repealed]

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 95; T.C.A., § 7-302; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113, repealed by Acts 2018, ch. 914, § 3, effective July 1, 2018.

Compiler's Notes. Section 58-1-602, concerning the unlawful wearing of uniform or insignia, is repealed by Acts 2018, ch. 914, § 3, effective July 1, 2018.

58-1-603. Unlawful traffic in military property.

Any person who shall purchase, receive in pledge, retain, or possess any article of arms, clothing, equipment, supply or other thing furnished and intended for the military service, unless lawfully issued to such person, is guilty of theft and punishable accordingly.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 25; T.C.A., § 7-303; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 66.

Cross-References. Fraudulent disposition of property furnished or intended for the national guard, § 58-1-630.

Loss, damage, destruction or wrongful disposition of military property by state military forces personnel is a felony punishable as theft, § 58-1-623.

Penalties under the military code, § 58-1-631.

Punishment for theft, § 39-14-105.

Responsibility for federal and state military property in hands of state military forces personnel, § 58-1-515.

Unauthorized sale or disposition of military property or equipment, § 58-1-634.

58-1-604. Discrimination against members of the national guard.

It is a Class E felony for any person, firm or corporation to refuse employment to any person for the sole reason that the person is a member of the Tennessee national guard or to terminate the employment of any such person for such reason or because of absence from place of employment while attending any prescribed drill, including annual field training.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 99; T.C.A., § 7-304; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 67.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for violation of chapter, § 58-1-631.

58-1-605. Commissioned officers' power to take oaths and acknowledgments.

In addition to the acknowledgment of instruments and the performance of other notarial acts in the manner and form and as otherwise provided by law, instruments may be acknowledged, documents attested, oaths and affirmations administered, depositions and affidavits executed, and other notarial acts performed in connection with any pleading or other instrument to be filed or used in any court in this state, before or by any commissioned officer in active service of the armed forces of the United States, with the rank of second lieutenant or higher, in the army or marine corps, or with the rank of ensign or higher, in the navy or coast guard, or with the equivalent rank in any other component part of the armed forces of the United States, by any person who is a member of the armed forces of the United States or the spouse of such member of the armed forces accompanying a spouse in such service.

Code 1858, § 2070 (deriv. Acts 1847-1848, ch. 82, § 1); Shan., § 3747; Code 1932, § 7662; Acts 1945, ch. 5, § 2; 1945, ch. 65, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 1012.30, 7662 (Williams, §§ 1012.33, 7662); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-305.

Cross-References. National guard officers authorized to administer oaths for purposes of military administration, § 58-1-234.

58-1-606. Validity of notarial acts of officers.

Such acknowledgment of instruments, attestation of documents, administration of oaths and affirmations, execution of depositions and affidavits, and performance of other notarial acts as aforementioned, heretofore or hereafter made or taken, are declared legal, valid and binding, and instruments and documents so acknowledged, authenticated, or sworn to, shall be admissible in evidence and eligible to record in this state under the same circumstances, and with the same force and effect, as if such acknowledgment, attestation, oath, affirmation, deposition, affidavit, or other notarial act as aforementioned, had been made or taken within this state before or by a duly qualified officer or official as otherwise provided by law.

Acts 1945, ch. 5, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.30 (Williams, § 1012.33); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-306.

58-1-607. Officer's certificate of notarial act.

In the taking of acknowledgments and the performing of other notarial acts requiring certification, a certificate endorsed upon or attached to the instrument or document, which shows the date of the notarial act and which states, in substance, that the person appearing before the officer acknowledged the instrument as such person's act, or made or signed the instrument or document under oath, shall be sufficient for all intents and purposes. The instrument or document shall not be rendered invalid by the failure to state the place of execution or acknowledgment.

If the signature, rank and branch of service or subdivision thereof of any such commissioned officer appear upon such instrument or document, or certificate, no further proof of the authority of such officer so to act shall be required, and such action by such commissioned officer shall be prima facie evidence that the person making such oath or acknowledgment is within the purview of §§ 58-1-605 — 58-1-607.

Acts 1945, ch. 5, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 1012.30 (Williams, § 1012.33); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-307.

58-1-608
— 58-1-610. [Reserved.]

Any person who:

Enlists or procures appointment in the national guard by means of knowingly false representations or deliberate concealment as to the person's qualifications for such enlistment or appointment and receives pay or allowances thereunder; or

Separates from the national guard by means of knowingly false representations or deliberate concealment as to the person's eligibility for such separation;

is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 55; T.C.A., § 7-311; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. False oath to statement in enlistment contract, § 58-1-222.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

58-1-612. Assistance with unlawful enlistment, appointment or separation.

Any person who effects an enlistment or appointment in or a separation from the national guard of any person who is known to such person to be ineligible for such enlistment, appointment, or separation because it is prohibited by law, regulation, or order is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 56; T.C.A., § 7-312; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

58-1-613. Absence without leave.

Any person of the Tennessee national guard who, without proper authority:

Fails to go to the appointed place of duty at the time prescribed;

Goes from that place; or

Absents self or remains absent from the unit, organization, or other place of duty at which the guard member is required to be at the time prescribed;

is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 57; T.C.A., § 7-313; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2008, ch. 716, § 1.

Cross-References. Absence without leave while on active state duty is a felony, § 58-1-621.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Sentinel, misbehavior as, § 58-1-627.

58-1-614. Missing movement.

Any member of the national guard, who through neglect or design, misses the movement of a ship, aircraft, units or other conveyances which movement is required as part of that member's duty is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 58; T.C.A., § 7-314; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Missing a movement while on active state duty is a felony, § 58-1-621.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-11.

58-1-615. Disrespect toward superior commissioned officer.

Any member of the national guard who behaves with disrespect toward the guard member's superior commissioned officer is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 59; T.C.A., § 7-315; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

58-1-616. Assaulting or willfully disobeying superior commissioned officer.

Any member of the national guard who:

Strikes the guard member's superior commissioned officer or draws or lifts up any weapon or offers any violence against that officer while in the execution of the officer's duty; or

Willfully disobeys a lawful command of the guard member's superior commissioned officer;

is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 60; T.C.A., § 7-316; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

58-1-617. Insubordinate conduct toward warrant officer or noncommissioned officer.

Any enlisted member of the national guard who:

Strikes or assaults a warrant officer or noncommissioned officer while that officer is in the execution of the officer's duty;

Willfully disobeys the lawful order of a warrant officer or noncommissioned officer; or

Treats with contempt, or is disrespectful in language or deportment toward a warrant officer or noncommissioned officer while that officer is in the execution of office;

is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 61; T.C.A., § 7-317; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

58-1-618. Failure to obey order or regulation.

Any member of the national guard who:

Violates or fails to obey any lawful general order or regulation;

Having knowledge of any other lawful order issued by a member of the Tennessee national guard, which it is the guard member's duty to obey, fails to obey the order; or

Is derelict in the performance of duties;

is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 62; T.C.A., § 7-318; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

58-1-619. Cruelty and maltreatment.

Any member of the national guard who is guilty of cruelty or oppression toward or maltreatment of, any person subject to the guard member's orders, is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 63; T.C.A., § 7-319; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

58-1-620. Mutiny or sedition.

Any member of the national guard who:

With intent to usurp or override lawful military authority, refuses, in concert with any other person, to obey orders or otherwise to do such guard member's duty or creates any violence or disturbance is guilty of mutiny;

With intent to cause the overthrow or destruction of lawful civil authority, creates, in concert with any other person, revolt, violence or other disturbances against that authority is guilty of sedition;

Fails to do the utmost to prevent and suppress a mutiny or sedition being committed in the guard member's presence, or fails to take all reasonable means to inform the superior commissioned officer or the commanding officer of a mutiny or sedition which the guard member knows or has reason to believe is taking place, is guilty of a failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition.

Any member of the national guard who is found guilty of attempted mutiny, sedition, or failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition is guilty of a Class C felony.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 64, T.C.A., § 7-320; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 68.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C felony, § 40-35-111.

58-1-621. Misbehavior on active duty.

Any member of the national guard who, while on active state duty:

Runs away;

Shamefully abandons, surrenders, or delivers up any command, unit, place, or military property which it is the guard member's duty to defend;

Through disobedience, neglect, or intentional misconduct endangers the safety of any such command, unit, place or military property;

Casts away arms or ammunition;

Is guilty of cowardly conduct;

Quits the guard member's place of duty to plunder or pillage; or

Causes false alarms in any command, unit, or place under control of the armed forces of the United States or the national guard;

is guilty of a Class E felony.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 65, T.C.A., § 7-321; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 69.

Cross-References. Absence without leave, § 58-1-613.

Malingering, § 58-1-628.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

Sentinel, misbehavior as, § 58-1-627.

58-1-622. False official statements.

Any person subject to §§ 58-1-611 — 58-1-634 as provided in § 58-1-632 who, with intent to deceive, signs any false record, return, regulation, order, or other official document, knowing the same to be false, or makes any other false official statement knowing the same to be false, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 66; T.C.A., § 7-322; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. False oath to statement in enlistment contract, § 58-1-222.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

58-1-623. Military property — Loss, damage, destruction or wrongful disposition.

Any person subject to §§ 58-1-611 — 58-1-634 as provided in § 58-1-632 who, without proper authority:

Sells or otherwise disposes of;

Willfully or through gross neglect damages, destroys, or loses; or

Willfully or through gross neglect suffers to be lost, damaged, destroyed, sold or wrongfully disposed of, any military property of the United States or of the state;

is guilty of a felony and punishable as in the case of theft.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 67; T.C.A., § 7-323; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 70.

Cross-References. Fraudulent disposition of property furnished or intended for national guard, § 58-1-630.

Penalties under the military code, § 58-1-631.

Punishment for theft, § 39-14-105.

Responsibility for federal and state military property in hands of state military forces personnel, §§ 58-1-514, 58-1-515.

Unauthorized sale or disposition of military property or equipment, § 58-1-634.

Unlawfully dealing in military property punishable as theft, § 58-1-603.

58-1-624. Property other than military property — Waste, spoilage, or destruction.

Any person subject to §§ 58-1-611 — 58-1-634 as provided in § 58-1-632 who, while on active state duty or in a duty status other than active state duty, willfully or recklessly wastes, spoils, or otherwise willfully and wrongfully destroys or damages any property other than military property of the United States or of the state, is guilty of a Class E felony.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 68; T.C.A., § 7-324; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 71.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

58-1-625. Drunken or reckless driving.

Any member of the national guard who operates any vehicle while drunk, or in a reckless or wanton manner is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 69; T.C.A., § 7-325.

Compiler's Notes. The misdemeanor penalty provision in this section may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-110, 40-35-111.

Cross-References. Penalty for misdemeanor, §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-111.

58-1-626. Drunk on duty.

Any member of the national guard who is found drunk on duty is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 70; T.C.A., § 7-326; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Misbehavior of sentinel, § 58-1-627.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

58-1-627. Misbehavior of a sentinel.

Any sentinel or lookout who is found drunk or sleeping upon the sentinel's or lookout's post, or who leaves it before regularly relieved, is guilty, if the offense is committed while the national guard is in active state service in the time of emergency, of a Class E felony; otherwise of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 71; T.C.A., § 7-327; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 72, 113.

Cross-References. Absence without leave, § 58-1-613.

Misbehavior on active duty, § 58-1-621.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

58-1-628. Malingering.

Any member of the national guard who for the purpose of avoiding work, duty or service:

Feigns illness, physical disablement, mental lapse or derangement; or

Intentionally inflicts self-injury;

is guilty of a Class E felony.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 72; T.C.A., § 7-328; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 73.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

58-1-629. Riot or breach of the peace.

Any member of the national guard who causes or participates in any riot or breach of the peace is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 73; T.C.A., § 7-329; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

58-1-630. Frauds against the government.

Any member of the national guard who:

Knowing it to be false or fraudulent:

Makes any claim against the state or any officer thereof; or

Presents to any person in the civil or military service thereof, for approval or payment, any claim against the state or any officer thereof;

For the purpose of obtaining the approval, allowance, or payment of any claim against the state or any officer thereof:

Makes or uses any writing or other paper knowing the same to contain any false or fraudulent statement;

Makes any oath to any fact or to any writing or other paper knowing such oath to be false; or

Forges or counterfeits any signature upon any writing or other paper, or uses any such signature knowing the same to be forged or counterfeited;

Having charge, possession, custody or control of any money or other property of the state, furnished or intended for the national guard or any force thereof, knowingly delivers to any person having authority to receive the same, any amount thereof less than that for which the person receives a certificate of receipt; or

Being authorized to make or deliver any paper certifying the receipt of any property of the state, furnished or intended for the national guard or any force thereof, makes or delivers to any person such writing without having full knowledge of the truth of the statements therein contained and with intent to defraud the state;

is guilty of a Class E felony.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 74; T.C.A., § 7-330; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 74.

Cross-References. Loss, damage, destruction or wrongful disposition of military property by national guard personnel, § 58-1-623.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

Responsibility for military property and funds, § 58-1-515.

Unauthorized sale or disposition of military property or equipment, § 58-1-634.

Unlawful dealing in military property is punishable as theft, § 58-1-603.

58-1-631. Penalties.

All violations of parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter including, but not limited to, §§ 58-1-611 — 58-1-633, are punishable under § 40-35-111.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 75; T.C.A., § 7-331.

58-1-632. Application and effect of §§ 58-1-611 — 58-1-633.

Sections 58-1-611 — 58-1-633 are applicable to members of the national guard while they are in a drill or duty status. The enumeration of crimes and offenses herein is declared to be cumulative to other criminal and penal statutes of the state, it being the intent of the general assembly that §§ 58-1-611 — 58-1-633 are designed solely to create certain specified offenses peculiar to the military and necessary to the discipline, training, proper functioning and the orderly government of the national guard.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 76; T.C.A., § 7-332.

58-1-633. Enlisted personnel — Explanation of penal laws.

Sections 58-1-611 — 58-1-633 shall be carefully explained to each enlisted member at the time of enlistment and annually thereafter.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 77; T.C.A., § 7-333.

58-1-634. Unauthorized sale or disposition of military property or equipment — Penalty.

Any person who shall sell, or offer for sale, barter or exchange, pledge, lend or give away, secrete, or retain after demand made by the civil or military officers of the state of Tennessee any clothing, arms, military outfits or accoutrements, or any other military property or equipment furnished by or through the state of Tennessee or the United States to any member of the military forces of the state of Tennessee, or who shall receive by purchase, barter, exchange, pledge, loan or gift, any such military property or equipment of the state of Tennessee or the United States, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Any person in the military forces of the state of Tennessee, to whom shall have been entrusted any military property or equipment by reason of being in such military service, shall account for the same to the proper military authority in accordance with the rules, regulations or special orders made by superior authorities in reference to the same, and such military property shall not be removed beyond the boundaries of the state of Tennessee unless required by the performance of the individual's military duties. Any person, whether in the military service or not, or whether enlistment or appointment shall have expired or not, who shall fail to account for or return to the proper military authorities any property which shall have come into such person's possession and to which the state of Tennessee or the United States may be entitled, or who shall conceal or convert the same to such person's own use, is guilty of a misdemeanor; provided further, that if such person leaves the state, after having failed to account for or return to the proper military authorities such property, such person is guilty of a felony and shall be punished as in the case of theft.

Any prosecution had under this section may be abated, in the discretion of the district attorney general, if, prior to arraignment, full satisfaction is made for the property involved to the proper military authorities of the state or the United States and the payment of all court costs accruing by reason of the institution of any such prosecution has been made.

This section is to be given general application and shall not be limited in its application by § 58-1-632, but is not to be construed in any way to amend or modify any prevailing laws regarding military property as heretofore and hereafter amended.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 67; 1978, ch. 612, § 1; T.C.A., § 7-334; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 75, 113.

Compiler's Notes. The misdemeanor penalty provision in subsection (a) may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Act of 1989. See §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-110, 40-35-111.

Cross-References. Care and custody of federal and state military property, §§ 58-1-514, 58-1-515.

Frauds against government, § 58-1-630.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Punishment for theft, § 39-14-105.

Unlawfully dealing in military property punishable as theft, § 58-1-603.

Wrongful disposition of military property punishable as theft, § 58-1-623.